anl/cwd_vs_crk/cwd_verb_affixes.lexc
LEXICON VAIn_PL_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VAIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VAIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VAIn_PL_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VAIn_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIae_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VAIae_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VAIae_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VAIw_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VAIw_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIw_PL_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VAIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VAIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VAIw_PL_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VAIw_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIio_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VAIio_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VAIio_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VAIw_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VAIw_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIn_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIn_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VAIn_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIn_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIn_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIn_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIn_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIn_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIn_PL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VAIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIn_PL_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIn_PL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIw_PL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VAIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIw_PL_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIw_PL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIae_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIae_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIae_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VAIae_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIae_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIae_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIae_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIae_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIae_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIio_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIio_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIio_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VAIio_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIio_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIio_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VAIio_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VAIio_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VAIio_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@ VAIn_IND_NI ;
@U.person.KI@ VAIn_IND_KI ;
@U.person.NULL@ VAIn_IND_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIn_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIn_CNJ_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIn_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIn_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIn_IMP_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIn_PL_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@ VAIn_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.KI@ VAIn_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.NULL@ VAIn_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIn_PL_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIn_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIn_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIn_PL_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIn_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIw_PL_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@ VAIw_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.KI@ VAIw_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.NULL@ VAIw_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIw_PL_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIw_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIw_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIw_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIw_PL_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIw_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIae_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@ VAIw_IND_NI ;
@U.person.KI@ VAIw_IND_KI ;
@U.person.NULL@ VAIae_IND_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIae_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIae_CNJ_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIw_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIae_FUT_CON_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIw_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIw_IMP_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIio_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@ VAIw_IND_NI ;
@U.person.KI@ VAIw_IND_KI ;
@U.person.NULL@ VAIio_IND_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIio_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VAIio_CNJ_NULL ;
LEXICON VAIw_IND_NI
VAIw_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIw_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>n2 VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIw_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX
+1Pl:%>n2ân VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIw_IND_KI
VAIw_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIw_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX
+2Sg:%>n2 VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIw_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX
+12Pl:%>n2aw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>n2ânaw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>n2âwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIae_IND_NULL
VAIae_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIio_IND_NULL
VAIio_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIae_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>w VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>n2iwiw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>n2iwan VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIio_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>w VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>n2âniwiw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>n2âniwan VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIw_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+3Pl:%>wak VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>thiwa VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_NI
VAIn_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIn_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_NI_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>in VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+Var/East:0 VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX
+1Pl:%>inân VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_KI
VAIn_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIn_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_KI_SG_SUFFIX
+2Sg:%>in VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+Var/East:0 VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX
+12Pl:%>aw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>ânaw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>âwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_NULL
VAIn_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIn_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+3Sg:%>0 VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+Dial:%>iw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>inâniwiw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>inâniwan VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+3Pl:%>wak VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+Dial:%>iwak VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ithiwa VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIae_CNJ_NULL
VAIae_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIio_CNJ_NULL
VAIio_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIae_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>yân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>yan VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>yin VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>t VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+Dial/West:%>hk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>n2iwahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>n2iwik VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIio_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>yân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>yan VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>yin VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>t VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+Dial/West:%>hk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>nâniwahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>nâniwik VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIw_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+1Pl:%>yâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>yahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>yîk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>cik VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl+Dial/West:%>twâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>thit VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_CNJ_NULL
VAIn_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIn_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIn_CNJ_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>iyân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+Var/East:%>ân VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>iyan VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>iyin VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+Var/East:%>an VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>k VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg+Dial:%>it VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X+Dial/West:%>ihk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>inâniwahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>inâniwik VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+1Pl:%>iyâhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+Var/East:%>âhk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>iyahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+Var/East:%>ahk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>iyîk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+Var/East:%>îk VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>kwâw VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ithit VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIw_IMP_NULL
VAIw_IMP_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIw_IMP_SG_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg:%>0   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg:%>hkan   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIw_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+Imm+12Pl:%>tân	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>k	 VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl:%>hkahk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl:%>hkîk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IMP_NULL
VAIn_IMP_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIn_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IMP_SG_SUFFIX
+Imm+2Sg:%>i   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Sg:%>îhkan   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+Imm+12Pl:%>itân	  VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>ik	 VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+12Pl:%>îhkahk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
+Del+2Pl:%>îhkîk   VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIae_FUT_CON_NULL
VAIw_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIw_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIw_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>yâni VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>yani VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>yini VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>ci VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>hki VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIw_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+1Pl:%>yâhki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>yahki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>yîko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>twâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>thici VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>hkwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL
VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX ;
VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL_SG_SUFFIX
+1Sg:%>iyâni VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Sg+Var/East:%>âni VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>iyani VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg:%>iyini VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Sg+Var/East:%>ani VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>ici VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Sg:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>ki VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VAIn_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX
+1Pl:%>iyâhki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+1Pl+Var/East:%>âhki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl:%>iyahki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+12Pl+Var/East:%>ahki VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl:%>iyîko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+2Pl+Var/East:%>îko VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>itwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+3Pl:%>kwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ithici VERB_ENDLEX ;
+X:%>kwâwi VERB_ENDLEX ;
LEXICON VTIm
+V+TI: VTIm_WICI ;
LEXICON VTIw
+V+TI: VAIae_WICI ;
LEXICON VTIm_PL
+V+TI: VTIm_PL_WICI ;
LEXICON VTIae
+V+TI: VAIae_WICI ; 
LEXICON VTIio
+V+TI: VAIio_WICI ; 
LEXICON VTIm_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VTIm_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@môm VTA_ORDER ;
LEXICON VTIm_PL_WICI
@U.wici.NULL@ VTIm_PL_ORDER ;
@U.wici.wici@+Der/Com+V+TA:@U.wici.wici@môm VTA_PL_ORDER ;
LEXICON VTIm_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VTIm_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VTIm_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VTIm_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTIm_PL_ORDER
@U.order.indep@+Ind:@U.order.indep@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.order.cnj@+Cnj:@U.order.cnj@ VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.order.imp@+Imp:@U.order.imp@  VTIm_PL_IMP_PERSON ;
@U.order.FutCon@+Fut+Cond:@U.order.FutCon@ VTIm_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTIm_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTIm_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTIm_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTIm_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTIm_PL_IND_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutDef@+Fut+Def:@U.tense.FutDef@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTIm_PL_CNJ_TENSE
@U.tense.Prs@+Prs:@U.tense.Prs@ VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.Prt@+Prt:@U.tense.Prt@ VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
@U.tense.FutInt@+Fut+Int:@U.tense.FutInt@ VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON ;
LEXICON VTIm_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@ VTIm_IND_NI ;
@U.person.KI@ VTIm_IND_KI ;
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_IND_NULL ;
LEXICON VTIm_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_CNJ_NULL ;
LEXICON VTIm_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL ;
LEXICON VTIm_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_IMP_NULL ;
LEXICON VTIm_PL_IND_PERSON
@U.person.NI@ VTIm_IND_NI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.KI@ VTIm_IND_KI_PL_SUFFIX ;
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_IND_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTIm_PL_CNJ_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_CNJ_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTIm_PL_FUT_CON_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_FUT_CON_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
LEXICON VTIm_PL_IMP_PERSON
@U.person.NULL@ VTIm_IMP_NULL_PL_SUFFIX ;
